Tennessee statutes. Title 58 Military Affairs, Emergencies and Civil Defense
Chapter 7

State Veterans' Homes

58-7-101. Establishment — Purpose — Funding requirements.

There shall be public homes for veterans in Tennessee known as “Tennessee state veterans' homes.”

The primary purpose of the homes shall be to provide support and care for honorably discharged veterans who served in the United States armed forces.

These homes shall be established and operated only if federal veterans' administration funds are available to meet a substantial part of any construction costs incurred in the establishment of such homes.

Additionally, each state veterans' home established pursuant to this chapter must be eligible for and receive the veterans' administration per diem payments available to qualified residents in accordance with applicable federal regulations.

Acts 1988, ch. 899, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Suddenly Discharged the Combat Continues: Eliminating the Legal Services Gap to Ensure Veterans' Success After Leaving Military Service, 45 U. Mem. L. Rev. 837 (2015).

The Credibility Trap: Notes on a VA Evidentiary Standard, 45 U. Mem. L. Rev. 887 (2015).

Attorney General Opinions. Under Tennessee state law, the Tennessee State Veterans' Homes (TSVH) may not admit veterans who received a general discharge under honorable conditions. TSVH is required to provide support and care for honorably discharged veterans who served in the United States armed forces. An “honorable discharge” from the United States armed forces is separate and distinct from “a general discharge under honorable conditions.” Furthermore, federal law does not preempt the eligibility requirements imposed by the state. To the contrary, federal law contemplates that each State will establish eligibility and admission criteria for its state veterans' homes. OAG 20-13, 2020 Tenn. AG LEXIS 17 (6/12/2020).

58-7-102. State veterans' homes board.

There is hereby created a body, politic and corporate, to be known as the “Tennessee state veterans' homes board.”

The board, a political subdivision and instrumentality of the state, shall be deemed to be acting in all respects for the benefit of the people of the state in the performance of essential public functions and shall be deemed to be serving a public purpose and improving and otherwise promoting their health, welfare, and prosperity.

The board shall consist of thirteen (13) members. The commissioner of veterans services and the commissioner of finance and administration shall be ex officio, voting members of the board. A commissioner may designate a staff member to attend meetings of the board or its committees and to exercise the commissioner's right to vote in the commissioner's absence. The designation shall be made in writing to the chair of the board. The remaining eleven (11) members shall be appointed by the governor. At least three (3) members shall be appointed from each of the three (3) grand divisions of the state. All appointments shall be subject to review by the joint select committee on veterans' affairs of the general assembly. Initial appointments to the board shall be for one (1), two (2) and three (3) years, respectively. Thereafter, all appointed members shall serve three-year terms. Each member must be a citizen of the state. One (1) member shall be a nursing home administrator at the time of the member's appointment and shall be experienced in the financial operations of nursing homes. One (1) member shall have clinical experience in nursing homes. The remaining members shall be honorably discharged veterans of the United States armed forces. Veteran members shall be appointed from nationally chartered service organizations that have departments in this state. The board shall be composed of members representing different organizations as well as different branches of the armed forces.

Appointed members of the board may be removed for cause by the governor.

Vacancies occurring in an office of a member of the board before the expiration of a term by reason of death, resignation, or any other reason shall be filled by the governor in the same manner as a regular appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term.

Acts 1988, ch. 899, § 2; 2008, ch. 1137, §§ 1, 2; 2015, ch. 24, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. The Tennessee state veterans' home board, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2023. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-244.

Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7 provided that the Tennessee Code Commission is requested to change references in Tennessee Code Annotated, as volumes are replaced and supplements are issued, from “veterans’ affairs” and “veterans affairs” to “veterans services” wherever the language appears in reference to the name or commissioner of the Tennessee department of veterans services.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

58-7-103. Powers and duties of board.

The board shall elect a chair from among its members. The chair shall be a citizen of the state and an honorably discharged veteran of the United States armed forces. The chair shall serve a two-year term. A chair may be reelected; provided, that no person shall serve as chair for more than two (2) consecutive terms.

The board shall also select other officers as the board finds necessary and appropriate. The positions are for a period of one (1) year, but members may be reelected to serve additional terms; provided, that no person shall serve for more than two (2) consecutive terms.

The board, pursuant to applicable state and federal law, is hereby vested and charged with those powers and duties necessary and proper to enable it to fully and effectively carry out this chapter, including, but not limited to:

The authority to determine the location of the Tennessee state veterans' homes. In selecting the sites, preference shall be given to publicly owned land. Land for the sites may be purchased only if suitable publicly owned land is not available;

The duty to adopt written policies and procedures to govern its internal operations;

The authority to acquire, in the name of the board, real or personal property or any interest therein, including rights or easements, on either a temporary or long-term basis by gift, purchase, transfer, foreclosure, lease or otherwise;

The authority to hold, sell, assign, lease, rent, encumber, mortgage or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property, or any interest therein, or mortgage interest owned by it or in its control, custody or possession and release or relinquish any right, title, claim, lien, interest, easement or demand however acquired, including threat of foreclosure;

The authority to incur debts, to borrow money, to issue debt instruments and to provide for the rights of the holders thereof;

The authority to procure insurance against any loss in connection with its property and other assets in amounts and from insurers which it deems desirable;

The authority to have employees authorized by the Tennessee state veterans' homes board solicit and receive bequests and donations for:

The improvement of the general comfort and welfare of the members of the home or homes; or

The future construction of a new home or homes;

The authority to seek advice from the United Tennessee Veterans' Association (UTVA);

The authority to seek assistance from the commissioner of finance and administration, the comptroller of the treasury, the state treasurer, and other state agencies;

Do other acts necessary or convenient to exercise the powers granted or reasonably implied in this section;

The authority to provide guidance to future administrators at state veterans' nursing homes based upon the collective institutional memory of the state veterans' homes board; and

The authority to notify members of the general assembly and appropriate persons in the executive branch of potential problems in state veterans' nursing homes.

Acts 1988, ch. 899, § 3; 2008, ch. 1137, §§ 3, 4; 2016, ch. 856, § 1; 2019, ch. 113, § 3.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “two-year term” for “one-year term” at the end of the third sentence in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 113, § 4. April 9, 2019.

58-7-104. Creation of executive committee — Duties.

There is created an executive committee of the board. The executive committee shall be composed of three (3) members of the board. One (1) member shall be the commissioner of finance and administration. The remaining two (2) members shall be elected by the board subject to the qualifications that one (1) member shall be either a nursing home administrator at the time of the member's appointment or someone who has clinical experience in nursing homes, and one (1) member who shall be the chair of the board.

The executive committee shall be responsible for the oversight of the day-to-day management and operation of state veterans' homes, including, but not limited to:

The authority to employ an executive director and other employees and to incur expenses as may be necessary for the proper discharge of its duties;

The authority to establish policies regarding the rates for patient care while in a state veterans' home; and

The authority to make and execute contracts and all other instruments necessary or convenient for the exercise of its powers and functions under this chapter, including contracts for the operation of the state veterans' homes. All contracts that pertain to the acquisition and improvement of real property pursuant to § 4-15-102 must be approved in advance by the building commission and must be approved by the board. Contracts for services must also be approved in advance pursuant to former § 12-4-109 [repealed].

The executive director shall be appointed by the executive committee subject to review by the full board. The compensation of the executive director shall be established by the executive committee. The executive director shall be subject to an annual review and shall serve at the pleasure of the executive committee.

The executive committee shall file a quarterly report with the fiscal review committee concerning the operations of each state veterans' nursing home. The report shall be filed within fifteen (15) business days following the end of each calendar quarter and include information for the three-month period. The report shall include detailed information concerning the extent to which each state veterans' nursing home is in compliance with state and federal law, as well as all actions taken by the executive committee to ensure compliance with the requirements of this chapter. The report shall also include any specific information requested by the chair of the fiscal review committee.

Acts 1988, ch. 899, § 4; 2008, ch. 1137, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 12-4-109, referred to in this section, was part of a repeal and reenactment by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. No provisions in Acts 2013, ch. 403 are comparable to the former provisions of § 12-4-109; therefore, § 12-4-109 appears to be repealed.

58-7-105. Reimbursement of board members.

Members of the board shall not be compensated for services rendered to the homes, but will be compensated for necessary expenses incurred by a member in the performance of the member's official duties. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the policies and guidelines approved by the board, but shall not exceed the maximum reimbursement for travel expenses allowed by the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1988, ch. 899, § 5.

58-7-106. Conflicts of interest.

If any matter before the board involves a project, transaction, or relationship in which a member or the member's associated institution, business or board has a direct or a conflicting interest, the member shall make known to the board that interest and shall be prohibited from participating in discussions and voting on that matter.

Acts 1988, ch. 899, § 6.

58-7-107. Incurrence of debt.

Prior to the adoption of any resolution or other action of the veterans' homes board authorizing the incurrence of debt or the borrowing of funds or entering into any contract or other arrangement for the planning or preparation for the incurrence of debt or the borrowing of funds, the veterans' homes board shall review such plans with the office of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee.

The state funding board is authorized to contract or to make other arrangements as it may deem necessary to provide for the issuance of such debt of the veterans' homes board, or in the state funding board's discretion, the veterans' homes board may enter into such contracts or other arrangements; provided, however, that any contract or arrangement entered into for the purpose of the issuance or incurrence of debt shall be subject to the approval of the state funding board.

Any resolution or other action of the veterans' homes board authorizing the issuance or incurrence of debt shall be submitted to the state funding board, and such resolution or other action shall only become effective upon receiving the approval of the state funding board.

Any instrument or document evidencing the debt or borrowing of funds by the veterans' homes board shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the effect that the debt or obligation is not a debt of the state, but is payable solely from revenues and moneys pledged to the payment thereof.

Acts 1988, ch. 899, § 7; 2010, ch. 868, § 82.

58-7-108. Disposition of funds.

The administrator of each home shall deposit with the state treasurer funds paid by veterans for their maintenance, funds received from the United States treasury and other funds given or granted to the home, including state funds. Such funds may be invested in the local government investment pool pursuant to title 9, chapter 4, part 7. The board is authorized to accept funds from any source whatever, including the federal government or any department or board thereof. All such funds received by the board for such state veterans' homes, including funds from the United States government or any federal board or program for the support of persons housed on the grounds of state veterans' homes, shall be used by the board to pay maintenance, operational and administrative expenses, and to further the objectives and purposes of the state veterans' homes. The board may establish such bank accounts pursuant to § 9-4-302 as are necessary for the efficient management of the homes.

Acts 1988, ch. 899, § 8.

58-7-109. Annual report.

The board shall make an annual report to the governor and to members of the government operations committees of the senate and the house of representatives and the joint select committee on veterans' affairs. This report shall contain an accounting of all money received and expended, statistics on members who resided in the home during the year, recommendations to improve state veterans' homes and such other matters as the board deems pertinent.

Acts 1988, ch. 899, § 9; 2008, ch. 1137, § 6.

58-7-110. Plan of operation.

At least thirty (30) days prior to the beginning of each fiscal year, the board shall submit a plan of operation for review and approval to the commissioner of veterans services, the commissioner of finance and administration and the comptroller of the treasury. The plan of operation shall be in such form as may be required by the state officials enumerated in this section and shall include, but not be limited to, a budget for operating and capital expenditures and appropriate policies and procedures adopted by the board to govern the expenditure of these funds. The plan of operation may be amended during a fiscal year with the written approval of the commissioner of veterans services, the commissioner of finance and administration and the comptroller of the treasury.

Acts 1988, ch. 899, § 10; 2015, ch. 24, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7 provided that the Tennessee Code Commission is requested to change references in Tennessee Code Annotated, as volumes are replaced and supplements are issued, from “veterans’ affairs” and “veterans affairs” to “veterans services” wherever the language appears in reference to the name or commissioner of the Tennessee department of veterans services.

58-7-111. Annual audit.

The comptroller of the treasury shall make an annual audit of the program established by this chapter as part of the comptroller's annual audit pursuant to § 9-3-211.

Acts 1988, ch. 899, § 11.

58-7-112. Application for federal grant — Other preparatory actions.

It is the intention of the general assembly that, in establishing state veterans' homes, the state shall apply for a grant from the United States veterans' administration and/or obtain its approval for leasing existing facilities pursuant to Public Law 95-62 (38 U.S.C. §§ 5031-5037). The department of veterans services is hereby authorized to submit such an application or applications on behalf of the board and take other preparatory actions to identify existing facilities for lease or purchase and process the necessary requests for proposals to a point so that contract negotiations could begin with the board when it is established.

Acts 1988, ch. 899, § 12; 2015, ch. 24, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7 provided that the Tennessee Code Commission is requested to change references in Tennessee Code Annotated, as volumes are replaced and supplements are issued, from “veterans’ affairs” and “veterans affairs” to “veterans services” wherever the language appears in reference to the name or commissioner of the Tennessee department of veterans services.

58-7-113. Bed occupancy.

Twenty-five percent (25%) of the bed occupants at any one (1) time of state veterans' homes authorized by this part may be veteran-related family members, i.e. spouses, surviving spouses, gold star parents and dependent children.

When a state veterans' home accepts grant assistance for a construction project, seventy-five percent (75%) of the bed occupants at that facility as a whole must be veterans.

Acts 1989, ch. 17, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1989, ch. 17, § 3 provided that the provisions of this section are retroactive and apply to any Tennessee veterans' home established prior to March 22, 1989, pursuant to this chapter.

Cross-References. Health care facilities' certificates of need, § 68-11-1621.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality, OAG 89-33 (3/10/89).

58-7-114. Death of resident — Notice to guardian or next of kin — Disposition of personal property.

Upon the death of a resident of a Tennessee state veterans' home, the administrator of the home shall promptly give notice of such death to the guardian or next of kin of such resident.

The administrator, executor or personal representative of the deceased person, or if there be none, one (1) or more of the heirs at law or next of kin, shall be notified by registered mail of any personal property owned by the deceased and left at the home at the time of the resident's death. Notice of an administrator, executor or personal representative shall be directed to the probate court of the county wherein the administrator, executor or personal representative is qualified to administer the estate of the deceased. Notice to the next of kin or heirs at law shall be addressed to the last known address of such person or persons.

The administrator of the home shall thereafter keep such personal property for twelve (12) months following the date of such notice or notices, at the expiration of which time, if it has not been claimed, the administrator shall sell or otherwise dispose of the property, with the approval of the state veterans' home foundation, incorporated, and deposit the proceeds from such sale or disposition in a fund, maintained under the supervision of the administrator for the purpose of providing needy patients or residents in the institution with comforts and necessities they are unable to provide for themselves.

If, after diligent search and inquiry, the name of none of the persons required to be notified in subsection (b) can be ascertained so that the required notice cannot be given, or the persons notified do not open the estate or otherwise proceed to dispose of the estate in a lawful manner, any property owned and left by any deceased resident in the home shall be kept for twelve (12) months after the death of the resident and if unclaimed, be disposed of as provided in subsection (c).

When any resident otherwise leaves the home, and leaves any personal property in the home, the administrator shall promptly notify such former resident by registered mail addressed to the resident's last known address of the fact that property belonging to the resident has been left at the home. Such property shall be kept for twelve (12) months from the date of the notice and if not claimed at the expiration of that time, disposed of as provided in subsection (c).

Acts 1993, ch. 302, § 1.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.